New Jersey, session 222, S594.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Each school district that includes grades nine through 12, or any combination thereof, shall incorporate instruction on the potential risks of compulsive gambling into the curriculum for students as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  The instruction shall include, but not be limited to, information on: (1)  the dangers of gambling addiction; (2)  taking risks with personal finances or personal assets; and (3)  probability versus predictability as it relates to gambling. b.  The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with resources designed to inform students of the potential risks of compulsive gambling. c.  The Commissioner of Education shall develop a training module on compulsive gambling for high school teachers to help local school districts in fulfilling the required gambling instruction established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The training module shall include, at a minimum: (1)  the ways compulsive gambling behaviors can develop; (2)  key indicators to watch for when determining if gambling is becoming a problem; and (3)  treatment implications to consider. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the Commissioner's development of the training module required pursuant to subsection c. of section 1 of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and the next review and update of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards performed by the State Board of Education pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-46).